Utah statutes.
20A-7-505.   Obtaining signatures -- Verification -- Removal of signature.
(1)  Any Utah voter may sign a local initiative petition if the voter is a
legal voter and resides in the local jurisdiction.
(2)  The sponsors shall ensure that the person in whose presence each
signature sheet was signed:
(a)  is at least 18 years old and meets the residency requirements of Section
20A-2-105; and
(b)  verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification printed on
the back of each signature sheet.
(3) (a) (i)  Any voter who has signed an initiative petition may have his
signature removed from the petition by submitting a notarized statement to
that effect to the local clerk.
(ii)  In order for the signature to be removed, the statement must be received
by the local clerk before he delivers the petition to the county clerk to be
certified.
(b)  Upon receipt of the statement, the local clerk shall remove the signature
of the person submitting the statement from the initiative petition.
(c)  No one may remove signatures from an initiative petition after the
petition is submitted to the county clerk to be certified.
